Wyoming, session 2025, SF0120.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-49-102(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xiii) and by renumbering (xiii) as (xiv) and
11-49-103(c)(v) by creating a new subparagraph (G) and by
creating new subsections (n) and (o) are amended to read:
11-49-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xiii) "Custom slaughter facility" means a
slaughter facility that does not have a state or federal
inspector on duty and where any meat produced from the
facility is not considered to be state or federally
inspected meat products;
(xiii)(xiv) "This act" means W.S. 11-49-101
through 11-49-104.
11-49-103. Wyoming Food Freedom Act; purpose;
exemptions; assumption of risk.
(c) Transactions under this act shall:
(v) Not involve the sale of meat products, with
the following exceptions:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0120
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(G) The sale of meat products under
subsection (n) of this section, subject to subsection (o)
of this section.
(n) Except as prohibited by federal law and subject
to subsection (o) of this section, a producer may sell meat
products from cattle, sheep, swine or goats raised by the
producer that were slaughtered on the premises of the
producer or at a custom slaughter facility, if all of the
following conditions are met:
(i) The meat products are produced from animals
that are raised, slaughtered, processed and sold in
Wyoming;
(ii) The meat products are sold directly to an
informed end consumer in Wyoming, whether for consumption
on or off the premises of the producer;
(iii) A prominent written warning statement is
delivered to the informed end consumer at the time of sale,
or the warning is displayed on a label affixed to the meat
product packaging. The warning required by this paragraph
shall state:
(A) The meat product has not been inspected
and is not regulated;
(B) An informed end consumer who obtains
meat products under this act agrees not to sell, donate or
commercially redistribute the meat;
(C) Information describing the standards
used by the producer with respect to animal health and in
the processing of meat from the animal.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0120
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) The producer shall not publish any
statement associated with the meat that implies or states
the Wyoming department of agriculture's approval or
endorsement of meat delivered under this subsection.
(o) Subsection (n) of this section shall be effective
on the date that the governor, on advice of the attorney
general, certifies to the secretary of state that the sale
of meat products from cattle, sheep, swine or goats raised
by the producer that were slaughtered on the premises of
the producer or at a custom slaughter facility is legalized
under federal law. Legalization under federal law shall
constitute either the passage of a federal law that allows
direct-to-consumer sales of uninspected meat products or
the issuance of a final decision by a federal court with
jurisdiction over this state that declares that the federal
prohibition on direct-to-consumer sales is unconstitutional
or otherwise invalid. Sales of meat products under
subsection (n) of this section shall be allowed upon the
governor's certification to the secretary of state that
sales of uninspected meat products have been legalized
under federal law.
Section 2.
(a) Upon certification by the governor that W.S.
11-49-103(n), as created by section 1 of this act, is
effective:
(i) The department of agriculture may promulgate
any rules necessary to implement this act;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0120
ENROLLED ACT NO. 16, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Producers may sell meat products
immediately upon certification in accordance with W.S.
11-49-103(n) and (o), as created by section 1 of this act.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4